Nebraska, session 109, LB565.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB565 LB565
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 84-901.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
84-901.03 (1) Upon the issuance of a guidance document, an agency
shall make such document available at one public location and on the
agency’s website. The agency shall also publish on its website an index
summarizing the subject matter of all currently applicable rules and
regulations and guidance documents. Such agency shall provide the index
electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature by December 31 of each
year.
(2) An agency shall ensure that the first page of each guidance
document includes (a) the following notice: This guidance document is
advisory in nature but is binding on an agency until amended by such
agency. A guidance document does not include internal procedural
documents that only affect the internal operations of the agency and does
not impose additional requirements or penalties on regulated parties or
include confidential information or rules and regulations made in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. If you believe that
this guidance document imposes additional requirements or penalties on
regulated parties, you may request a review of the document and (b) a
description, including an estimated quantification, of the fiscal impact
on state agencies, political subdivisions, and regulated persons or
businesses.
(3) A person may request in writing that an agency revise or repeal
a guidance document or convert a guidance document into a rule or
regulation. No later than sixty calendar days after the agency receives
such a request, the agency shall advise the requestor in writing of its
decision to (a) revise or repeal the guidance document, (b) initiate a
proceeding to consider a revision or repeal of a guidance document, (c)
initiate the rulemaking or regulationmaking process to convert the
guidance document into a rule or regulation, or (d) deny the request and
state the reason for the denial.
-2-

LB565 LB565
2025 2025
(4) All decisions made by an agency under this section shall be made
available at one public location and on the agency’s website.
(5) An agency shall not issue guidance documents on or after July 1,
2025, and before July 1, 2027, unless specifically required by amendments
to existing federal rules or to become compliant with new federal rules
and regulations.
(6) A guidance document shall not impose greater regulations on
Nebraska residents or businesses than federal requirements.
(7) All guidance documents and provider bulletins issued on or after
July 1, 2022, and before July 1, 2025, are revoked pending a formal
rulemaking process as provided in the Administrative Procedure Act unless
explicitly required for federal compliance.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 3. Original section 84-901.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-